Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 31
TUNNELS - RIGHTS-OF-WAY

Section

34-31-101. Tunnels - rights-of-way - condemnation.

The owner or his agent of any coal lands lying on two or more sides of the property of another shall have the right to enter and cross such adjoining or intermediate claims or property with such drifts, tunnels, and crosscuts as may be necessary for the practical or economical mining and development of his own property and for the purpose of extracting and removing coal therefrom. Such drifts, tunnels, crosscuts, and entries for the mining and development of coal shall not exceed six hundred sixty feet in length and shall not enter or cross any adjoining or intermediate claims or property which are operated at the time of entry or may reasonably be expected to be operated in the future either as a coal mine or as a part of an operating coal mine.

Neither shall such drifts, tunnels, crosscuts, or entries for coal mining enter a seam of coal which it may reasonably be expected will be operated or mined in the future. Any such drifts, tunnels, crosscuts, or entries driven for the development of coal lands or which cross coal lands must conform to all pertinent laws relating to coal mines, and in no event shall such tunnels, drifts, crosscuts, or entries for coal mining be driven or maintained across any intermediate property if they interfere with the operation of said intermediate claim or property, nor if such drifts, tunnels, crosscuts, or entries for coal mining will interfere with the ventilation of any operations then or thereafter to be conducted in said intermediate property, nor if said drifts, tunnels, crosscuts, or entries for coal mining will damage the surface of said intermediate property or any seams of coal lying above said drifts, tunnels, crosscuts, or entries. In the construction of such drifts, tunnels, crosscuts, or entries for coal mining, no barrier pillars may be removed or destroyed without the consent of the owners of such barrier pillars.

In the event such drifts, tunnels, crosscuts, or entries pertain to the development of coal lands or cross intermediate coal lands, they shall be subject to all pertinent laws and regulations relating to coal mines. When any such owner and the owners of such adjoining property through which such owner desires to pass under the terms of this article shall be unable to agree upon the terms and conditions and purchase price of rights-of-way for such necessary drifts, tunnels, and crosscuts, then the owner seeking to exercise the rights granted in this section may exercise the rights of eminent domain and condemn a right-of-way into, across, and through such intermediate or adjacent lands such as may be necessary for the practical and economical working of his own property, and such rights-of-way shall be deemed and are hereby declared to be private ways of necessity.

The value of the property taken in condemnation proceedings shall include, among other things, the value in place of the coal which will be mined or removed in the construction of any drift, tunnel, crosscut, or entry, and also the value of any coal which the owners thereof have a right to mine or remove and which by reason of the construction and operation of such drifts, tunnels, crosscuts, or entries cannot be removed with due regard to the safety or convenience of the operations of such mine or part of such mine. Customary charges for use through said private way of necessity for haulage purposes shall be assessed on each ton of coal received through said private way of necessity.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 483, § 1.

CSA:

C. 110, § 190.

L. 43:

p. 432, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 92-12-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-12-1.

Cross references:

For proceedings in eminent domain under this section, see articles 1 to 7 of title 38.

34-31-102. Accounting.

Any owner exercising the rights and privileges granted in this article shall do so in such manner as not to interfere with the mining operations of the owner into or through whose property he seeks to go, and shall extract only such ore as is necessary in the reasonable exercise of the rights granted by this article, and all ore extracted shall be accounted for by the person exercising such rights to the owner of the property from which such ore is taken, at its gross value on the surface.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 474, § 2.

CSA:

C. 110, § 191.

CRS 53:

§ 92-12-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-12-2.

34-31-103. Surveys.

The owner of such land through which it is proposed to construct such tunnel shall have the right at any reasonable time and from time to time, upon application to the superintendent or other managing officer of such condemning owner, to enter his works with their surveyors and inspectors for the purpose of inspection and making a survey of any such works and shall have the right of ingress and egress through said works at all reasonable times.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 484, § 3.

CSA:

C. 110, § 192.

CRS 53:

§ 92-12-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-12-3.